Yamls/Pron-kin_gt-norm.yaml
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: киннэзкӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: киннэзӧскӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: киннэзлӧнкӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl: киннэзліськӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat: киннэзлӧкӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins: киннэзӧнкӧ 
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: киннэзкӧткӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car: киннэзкӧтӧг
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns: киннэзлакӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr: [киннэзсякӧ, киннэзкӧся]
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: киннэзынкӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: киннэзіськӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: киннэзӧкӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr: [киннэзланькӧ, киннэзкӧлань]
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr: [киннэзсянькӧ, киннэзкӧсянь]
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl: киннэзӧткӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI: киннэзӧдзкӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII: [киннэзвикӧ, киннэзкӧви]
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne: киннэзкӧланьын
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEla: киннэзкӧланись
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll: киннэзкӧланьӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr: киннэзкӧланьсянь
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl: киннэзкӧланьӧт
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI: киннэзкӧланьӧдз
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII: киннэзкӧланьви

Pronoun – мыйкӧ: # Indefinite Pronoun 'Jokin / что-то'
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: мыйкӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: мыйкӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: мыйлӧнкӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl: мыйліськӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat: мыйлӧкӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins: мыйӧнкӧ 
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: мыйкӧткӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car: мыйкӧтӧг
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns: мыйлакӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr: [мыйсякӧ, мыйкӧся]
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: мыйынкӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: мыйиськӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: мыйӧкӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr: [мыйланькӧ, мыйкӧлань]
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr: [мыйсянькӧ, мыйкӧсянь]
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl: мыйӧткӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI: мыйӧдзкӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII: [мыйвикӧ, мыйкӧви]
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne: мыйкӧланьын
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla: мыйкӧланись
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll: мыйкӧланьӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr: мыйкӧланьсянь
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl: мыйкӧланьӧт
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI: мыйкӧланьӧдз
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII: мыйкӧланьви

    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: мыйезкӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: мыйезкӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: мыйезлӧнкӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl: мыйезліськӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat: мыйезлӧкӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins: мыйезӧнкӧ 
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: мыйезкӧткӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car: мыйезкӧтӧг
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns: мыйезлакӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr: [мыйезсякӧ, мыйезкӧся]
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: мыйезынкӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: мыйезіськӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: мыйезӧкӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr: [мыйезланькӧ, мыйезкӧлань]
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr: [мыйезсянькӧ, мыйезкӧсянь]
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl: мыйезӧткӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI: мыйезӧдзкӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII: [мыйезвикӧ, мыйезкӧви]
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne: мыйезкӧланьын
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEla: мыйезкӧланись
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll: мыйезкӧланьӧ
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr: мыйезкӧланьсянь
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl: мыйезкӧланьӧт
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI: мыйезкӧланьӧдз
    мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII: мыйезкӧланьви
